Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 24. Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority.
§ 23.1-2412.
Transfer of existing hospital facilities.

The University may lease, convey, or otherwise transfer to the Authority any or all assets and liabilities appearing on the balance sheet of MCV Hospitals and any or all of the hospital facilities, except real estate that may be leased to the Authority for a term not to exceed 99 years, upon such terms as may be approved by the University.

Any transfer of hospital facilities pursuant to subsection A is conditioned upon the existence of a binding agreement between the University and the Authority:

That requires the Authority to assume, directly or indirectly, hospital obligations that are directly relating to the hospital facilities or any part of the hospital facilities that are transferred, including rentals as provided in subsection C or a combination of rentals and other obligations in the case of a lease of hospital facilities;

That provides that, effective on the transfer date, the Authority shall assume responsibility for, defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the University and its officers and directors with respect to:

All liabilities and duties of the University pursuant to contracts, agreements, and leases for commodities, services, and supplies used by MCV Hospitals, including property leases;

All claims relating to the employment relationship between employees of the Authority and the University on and after the transfer date;

All claims for breach of contract resulting from the Authority’s action or failure to act on and after the transfer date;

All claims relating to the Authority’s errors and omissions, including medical malpractice, directors’ and officers’ liability, workers’ compensation, automobile liability, premises liability, completed operations liability, and products liability resulting from the Authority’s action or failure to act on and after the transfer date; and

Any lease of hospital facilities from the University to the Authority may include a provision that requires the Authority to pay the University a rental payment for the hospital facilities that are leased. For those hospital facilities for which rent is paid, the rent shall be at least equal to the greater of:

The debt service accruing during the term of the lease on all outstanding bonds issued for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, or improvement of the hospital facilities on which rent is paid; or

A nominal amount determined by the parties to be necessary to prevent the lease from being unenforceable because of a lack of consideration.

Any lease of hospital facilities shall include a provision that requires the Authority to continue to support the education, research, patient care, and public service missions of MCV Hospitals, including:

A requirement that the Authority continue to provide emergency and inpatient indigent care services on the MCV campus of the University in locations including downtown Richmond; and

A requirement that the Authority continue to act as the primary teaching facility for the Health Sciences Schools of the University.

All other agencies and officers of the Commonwealth shall take such actions as may be necessary or desirable in the judgment of the University to permit such conveyance and the full use and enjoyment of the hospital facilities, including the transfer of property of any type held in the name of the Commonwealth or an instrumentality or agency of the Commonwealth but used by the University in the operation of the hospital facilities.

The Authority may pay to or on behalf of the University some or all of the costs of the hospital facilities. The University may apply some or all of such proceeds to the payment or defeasance of its obligations issued to finance the hospital facilities, and the Authority may issue its bonds to finance or refinance such payment.

Funds held by or for the University or any of its predecessors or divisions, including funds held by the University Foundation or the MCV Foundation for the benefit of MCV Hospitals or any of its predecessors for use in operating, maintaining, or constructing hospital facilities, providing medical and health sciences education, or conducting medical or related research may be transferred, in whole or in part, to the Authority if the University or any foundation determines that the transfer is consistent with the intended use of the funds. The University may direct in writing that all or part of the money or property representing its beneficial interest under a will, trust agreement, or other donative instrument be distributed to the Authority if the University determines that such direction furthers any of the original purposes of the will, trust agreement, or other instrument. Such a direction shall not be considered a waiver, disclaimer, renunciation, assignment, or disposition of the beneficial interest by the University. A fiduciary’s distribution to the Authority pursuant to such a written direction from the University is a distribution to the University for all purposes relating to the donative instrument, and the fiduciary has no liability for distributing any money or property to the Authority pursuant to such a direction. Nothing in this section shall deprive any court of its jurisdiction to determine whether such a distribution is appropriate under its cy pres powers or otherwise.

The Authority shall not operate any hospital pursuant to this section prior to execution of the lease and agreement required by this section and such other agreements as may be necessary or convenient in the University’s judgment to provide for the transfer of the operations of the hospital facilities to the Authority, unless and to the extent that the University approves otherwise.

The University may assign and the Authority may accept the rights and assume the obligations under any contract or other agreement of any type relating to financing or operating the hospital facilities. Upon evidence that such assignment and acceptance has been made, all agencies and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth shall consent to such assignment and accept the substitution of the Authority for the University as a party to such agreement to the extent that the University’s obligations under such agreement relate to the ownership, operation, or financing of the hospital facilities. Indebtedness previously incurred by the Commonwealth, the Virginia Public Building Authority, the Virginia College Building Authority, and any other agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth to finance the hospital facilities may continue to remain outstanding after the transfer and assignment of such agreement by the University to the Authority.

The transfer of the hospital facilities from the University to the Authority does not require a certificate of public need pursuant to Article 1.1 (§

32.1-102.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 32.1. All licenses, permits, certificates of public need, or other authorizations of the Commonwealth, any agency of the Commonwealth, or any locality held by the University in connection with the ownership or operation of the hospital facilities are transferred without further action to the Authority to the extent that the Authority undertakes the activity permitted by such authorizations. All agencies and officers of the Commonwealth and all localities shall confirm such transfer by the issuance of new or amended licenses, permits, certificates of public need, or other authorizations upon the request of the University and the Authority.

If for any reason the Authority cannot replace the University as a party to any agreement in connection with the financing, ownership, or operation of the hospital facilities, the Authority and the University may require the Authority to act as agent for the University in carrying out its obligations under such agreement or receiving the benefits under such agreement, or both.

3.

By which the Authority shall accept and agree to abide by provisions that ensure the continued support of the education, research, patient care, and public service missions of MCV Hospitals, including:

a.

A requirement that the Authority continue to provide emergency and inpatient indigent care services on the MCV campus of the University in locations including downtown Richmond; and

b.

A requirement that the Authority continue to act as the primary teaching facility for the Virginia Commonwealth University School of Medicine and the Health Sciences Schools of the University.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, §§ 23-50.16:17, 23-50.16:20, 23-50.16:21, 23-50.16:22, 23-50.16:23; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2413.
Capital projects.

All capital projects of the Authority shall be approved by the board. Within 30 days after approval of any capital project in excess of $5 million, the board shall notify the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees of the scope, cost, and construction schedule of the proposed capital project. The board may undertake the project unless either Committee raises objections within 30 days of the notification, in which case the Authority shall not undertake the project until such objections are resolved.

Before the Authority materially increases the size or materially changes the scope of any capital project for which construction has commenced, such project shall be approved again by the board in accordance with subsection A and, in the case of any capital project in excess of $5 million, presented again to the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees in accordance with subsection A.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Authority is not subject to any further process or procedure that requires the submission, review, or approval of any capital project; however, the Authority shall ensure that Building Officials and Code Administrators (BOCA) Code or any successor code and fire safety inspections are conducted for any capital project and that such projects are inspected by the State Fire Marshal or his designee prior to certification for building occupancy.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:18; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “Building Officials and Code Administrators (BOCA) Code or any successor code” for “BOCA Code” in subsection C.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Fire inspections of capital projects. —

The State Fire Marshal or his designee is not required to perform, without compensation, preoccupancy inspections of capital projects owned by the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William C. Shelton, Director, Department of Housing and Community Development, 03-087, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 35 (7/22/04).

The Fire Marshal or his designee is required to perform, without compensation, preoccupancy inspections of capital projects owned by Virginia Commonwealth University and leased under conventional lease to the Authority. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William C. Shelton, Director, Department of Housing and Community Development, 03-087, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 35 (7/22/04).

Sovereign immunity. —

Supreme Court likely would find VCU Health System Authority to be an arm of the Commonwealth and therefore entitled to absolute immunity. Even if the Court were not to agree, however, VCU Health System Authority also satisfies the criteria of a quasi-municipal corporation and therefore would be entitled to immunity for governmental functions. The Virginia Tort Claims Act exposes the Commonwealth, but not VCU Health System Authority, to limited liability for the negligent acts of its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James P. “Jimmie” Massie III, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 17-005, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (12/7/17).

§ 23.1-2414.
Leases of property.

Leases of real property that the Authority enters into are exempt from the provisions of §

2.2-1149

and from any policies, regulations, and guidelines of the Division of Engineering and Buildings.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:19; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2415.
Employees of the Authority.

Employees of the Authority shall be employed on such terms and conditions as established by the Authority. The board shall develop and adopt policies and procedures that afford its employees grievance rights, ensure that employment decisions are based upon the merit and fitness of applicants, and prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.

The Authority shall issue a written notice to all individuals whose employment is transferred to the Authority. The date upon which such written notice is issued is referred to in this section as the “Option Date.” Each individual whose employment is transferred to the Authority may, by written request made within 180 days of the Option Date, elect not to become employed by the Authority. Any employee of MCV Hospitals who (i) elects not to become employed by the Authority; (ii) is not reemployed by any department, institution, board, commission, or agency of the Commonwealth; (iii) is not offered alternative employment by the Authority; (iv) is not offered a position with the Authority for which the employee is qualified; or (v) is offered a position by the Authority that requires relocation or a reduction in salary is eligible for the severance benefits conferred by the provisions of the Workforce Transition Act (§

2.2-3200

et seq.). Any employee who accepts employment with the Authority has voluntarily separated from state employment and is not eligible for the severance benefits conferred by the provisions of the Workforce Transition Act.

Without limiting its power generally with respect to employees, the Authority may employ any University employee utilized in the operation of the hospital facilities and assume obligations under any employment agreement for such employee, and the University may assign any such contract to the Authority.

The Authority and the University may enter into agreements providing for the purchase of services of University employees utilized in the operation of the hospital facilities by paying agreed-upon amounts to cover all or part of the salaries and other costs of such employees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any employee whose employment is transferred to the Authority as a result of this chapter and who is a member of any plan for providing health insurance coverage pursuant to Chapter 28 (§

2.2-2800

et seq.) of Title 2.2 shall continue to be a member of such health insurance plan under the same terms and conditions of such plan.

Notwithstanding subsection A of §

2.2-2818

, the costs of providing health insurance coverage to employees who elect to continue to be members of the state employees’ health insurance plan shall be paid by the Authority.

Any employee of the Authority may elect to become a member of any health insurance plan established by the Authority. The Authority may (i) establish a health insurance plan for the benefit of its employees, residents, and interns and (ii) enter into an agreement with the Department of Human Resource Management providing for the coverage of its employees, interns, and residents under the state employees’ health insurance plan, provided that such agreement requires the Authority to pay the costs of providing health insurance coverage under such plan.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any employee whose employment is transferred to the Authority as a result of this chapter and who is a member of the Virginia Retirement System or another retirement plan as authorized by Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1 shall continue to be a member of the Virginia Retirement System or such other authorized retirement plan under the same terms and conditions of such plan. Any such employee and any employee employed by the Authority between July 1, 1997, and June 30, 1998, who elected to be covered by the Virginia Retirement System may elect, during an open enrollment period from April 1, 2001, through April 30, 2001, to become a member of the retirement plan established by the Authority for the benefit of its employees pursuant to §

23.1-2416

by transferring assets equal to the actuarially determined present value of the accrued basic benefit as of the transfer date. The Authority shall reimburse the Virginia Retirement System for the actual cost of actuarial services necessary to determine the present value of the accrued basic benefit of employees who elect to transfer to the Authority’s retirement plan. The following rules shall apply to such transfers:

With respect to any transferred employee who elects to remain a member of the Virginia Retirement System or another authorized retirement plan, the Authority shall collect and pay all employee and employer contributions to the Virginia Retirement System or such other authorized retirement plan for retirement in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of Title 51.1 for such transferred employees.

Transferred employees who elect to become members of the retirement plan established by the Authority for the benefit of its employees shall be given full credit for their creditable service as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, vesting and benefit accrual under the retirement plan established by the Authority. For any such employee, employment with the Authority shall be treated as employment with any nonparticipating employer for purposes of the Virginia Retirement System or other retirement plan as authorized by Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1.

For transferred employees who elect to become members of the retirement plan established by the Authority, the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized plan shall transfer to the retirement plan established by the Authority assets equal to the actuarially determined present value of the accrued basic benefit as of the transfer date. For the purposes of such calculation, the basic benefit is the benefit accrued under the Virginia Retirement System or another authorized retirement plan based on creditable service and average final compensation as defined in §

51.1-124.3

and determined as of the transfer date. The actuarial present value shall be determined on the same basis, using the same actuarial factors and assumptions used in determining the funding needs of the Virginia Retirement System or such other authorized retirement plan so that the transfer of assets to the retirement plan established by the Authority has no effect on the funded status and financial stability of the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:24; 1998, c. 449; 2000, cc. 66, 657; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314; 2020, c. 1137.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “retirement plan” for “retirement program” throughout subsection H.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137 inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the last sentence of subsection A.

§ 23.1-2416.
Retirement benefits for employees of the Authority.

The Authority may establish and determine the effective date of one or more retirement plans covering in whole or in part its employees, including employees who, prior to the effective date of any plan established pursuant to this section, participated in any plan established pursuant to §

51.1-126

or

51.1-126.1

or former §

51.1-126.2

. The Authority may make contributions for the benefit of its employees who elect to participate in such plan or arrangement rather than in any other retirement system established by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of Title 51.1.

Except in the case of an employee of the Authority hired prior to July 1, 1998, who made an irrevocable election to participate in the retirement plan established by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of Title 51.1 or any plan previously established by the Authority in accordance with guidelines established by the Authority, each eligible employee of the Authority shall participate in a plan established by the Authority pursuant to subsection A.

No employee of the Authority who is an active member of a plan established pursuant to subsection A shall also be an active member of the retirement system established pursuant to Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of Title 51.1 or a beneficiary of such retirement system other than as a contingent annuitant.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the contribution by the Authority to any other retirement plan established pursuant to subsection A on behalf of employees of the Authority hired before July 1, 1998, shall be equal to the lesser of (i) the contribution the Commonwealth would be required to make if the employee were a member of the retirement system established by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of Title 51.1 or (ii) eight percent of creditable compensation. The contribution by the Authority to any retirement plan established pursuant to subsection A on behalf of employees of the Authority hired on or after July 1, 1998, shall be determined by the board.

If the University has adopted a retirement plan under §

51.1-126

for its employees who are engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties, the plan established by the Authority pursuant to subsection A shall offer similar investment opportunities as are available to the participants of the plan established pursuant to §

51.1-126

.

The Authority shall develop policies and procedures for the administration of any retirement plan established by the Authority pursuant to subsection A. A copy of such policies and procedures shall be filed with the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

History.

1998, c. 449, § 23-50.16:24.1; 2016, c. 588.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for retired state employees, see §

51.1-1400

.

§ 23.1-2417.
Insurance for employees of the Authority.

The Authority shall purchase group life, accidental death and dismemberment, and disability insurance policies covering in whole or in part its employees. Authority employees are not required to present at their own expense evidence of insurability satisfactory to an insurance company for basic group life insurance coverage. Any employee hired prior to July 1, 1998, shall be provided basic group life insurance at the same level of coverage as provided by the Virginia Retirement System. Any employee hired on or after July 1, 1998, shall be provided basic group life insurance at a level of coverage determined by the board that is not less than the equivalent of the employee’s annual salary. The Authority may require employees hired on or after July 1, 1998, to pay all or a portion of the required basic group life insurance coverage. Such payment may be collected through a payroll deduction program. The Authority may increase the insurance coverage under such policies to make available to active insured employees optional life, accidental death and dismemberment, and disability insurance. Authority employees are not covered by the Virginia Retirement System’s group insurance program under §

51.1-501

.

History.

1998, c. 449, § 23-50.16:24.2; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2418.
Power to issue bonds.

The Authority may issue bonds for any of its purposes, including (i) financing or refinancing all or any part of its programs or general operations; (ii) costs of any project, including the hospital facilities, whether or not owned by the Authority; or (iii) to refund bonds or other obligations issued by or on behalf of the Authority, the University, or otherwise, including bonds or obligations not then subject to redemption. The Authority may guarantee, assume, or otherwise agree to pay, in whole or in part, indebtedness issued by the University or any other party resulting in the acquisition or construction of facilities for the benefit of the Authority or the refinancing of such indebtedness.

Notwithstanding Article 1 (§

2.2-1800

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 2.2, bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without (i) obtaining the consent of any commission, board, bureau, political subdivision, or agency of the Commonwealth or (ii) any proceedings, conditions, or things other than those proceedings, conditions, or things that are specifically required by this chapter; however, each debt offering shall be submitted to the State Treasurer sufficiently prior to the sale of such offering to allow the State Treasurer to undertake a review for the sole purposes of determining (a) whether the offering may constitute tax-supported debt of the Commonwealth and (b) the potential impact of the offering on the debt capacity of the Commonwealth. After such review, the State Treasurer shall determine if the offering constitutes tax-supported debt of the Commonwealth and the potential impact of the offering on the debt capacity of the Commonwealth. If the State Treasurer determines that the debt offering may constitute tax-supported debt of the Commonwealth or may have an adverse impact on the debt capacity of the Commonwealth, then the debt offering shall be submitted to the Treasury Board for review and approval of the terms and structure of the offering in a manner consistent with §

2.2-2416

.

The Authority may issue bonds payable as to principal and interest from any of the following sources: (i) its revenues generally; (ii) income and revenues derived from the operation, sale, or lease of a particular project or projects, whether or not they are financed or refinanced from the proceeds of such bonds; (iii) funds realized from the enforcement of security interests or other liens or obligations securing such bonds; (iv) proceeds from the sale of bonds; (v) payments under letters of credit, policies of municipal bond insurance, guarantees, or other credit enhancements; (vi) any reserve or sinking funds created to secure such payment; (vii) accounts receivable of the Authority; or (viii) other available funds of the Authority.

Any bonds may be guaranteed by or secured by a pledge of any grant, contribution, or appropriation from a participating political subdivision, the University, the Commonwealth or any political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth or from any federal agency or any unit, private corporation, partnership, association, or individual.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:25; 2016, c. 588.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sovereign immunity. —

Supreme Court likely would find VCU Health System Authority to be an arm of the Commonwealth and therefore entitled to absolute immunity. Even if the Court were not to agree, however, VCU Health System Authority also satisfies the criteria of a quasi-municipal corporation and therefore would be entitled to immunity for governmental functions. The Virginia Tort Claims Act exposes the Commonwealth, but not VCU Health System Authority, to limited liability for the negligent acts of its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James P. “Jimmie” Massie III, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 17-005, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (12/7/17).

§ 23.1-2419.
Liability on bonds.

No member of the board; officer, employee, or agent of the Authority; or person executing bonds of the Authority is liable personally on the bonds by reason of issuing or executing such bonds. Bonds of the Authority are not a debt of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth other than the Authority and shall so state on their face. Neither the Commonwealth nor any political subdivision of the Commonwealth other than the Authority is liable for payment of bonds of the Authority, nor shall such bonds be payable out of any funds or properties of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth other than those of the Authority, except as permitted by §

23.1-2418

. Bonds of the Authority are issued for an essential public and governmental purpose.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:26; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2420.
Form of bonds.

Bonds of the Authority shall (i) be authorized by resolution setting forth the maximum principal amount issuable, (ii) be dated, and (iii) mature not more than 40 years from their date and may be (a) issued in one or more series and (b) made redeemable or subject to tender before maturity, at the option of the Authority, at such price or under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Authority or its agents prior to issuance.

Bonds of the Authority shall bear interest payable at such times and rates and in such manner as the Authority or its agents may determine, including rates approved by officers of the Authority under authorization of the board, rates tied to indices, rates of other securities, or other standards and determinations by agents designated by the Authority under guidelines established by the Authority.

The Authority shall determine the form, manner of execution, and denominations of its bonds and the place of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company or securities depository within or outside the Commonwealth. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, and provision may be made for their registration in whole or in part. Bonds issued in registered form may be issued under a system of book-entry for recording the ownership and transfer of ownership of rights to receive payments on the bonds.

If any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or coupons ceases to hold such office before delivery of such bond, such signature or facsimile is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes.

The Authority may contract for the services of one or more banks, trust companies, financial institutions, or other entities or persons within or outside the Commonwealth for the authentication, registration, transfer, exchange, and payment of bonds or provide such services itself. The Authority may sell such bonds at public or private sale and for such price as it determines.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any recitals in any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, all such bonds are negotiable instruments under the laws of the Commonwealth.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Authority may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds that are exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds are executed and available for delivery.

The Authority may provide for the replacement of any mutilated, destroyed, stolen, or lost bonds.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:27; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2421.
Trust indentures and mortgages; security for the bonds.

Any bond issued under this chapter may be issued pursuant to or secured by (i) a trust indenture, deed of trust, or mortgage of any project or other property of the Authority, whether or not financed in whole or in part from the proceeds of such bonds; (ii) a trust or other agreement with a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside the Commonwealth or another agent for bondholders; or (iii) any combination of issuance or security set forth in clause (i) or (ii). Any such trust indenture or other agreement, or the resolution providing for the issuance of bonds, may pledge or assign fees, rents, and other charges to be received and contain reasonable, proper, and lawful provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders, including covenants (a) providing for the collection and application of revenues and the repossession and sale of any project or other property by the Authority or any trustees under any trust indenture or agreement upon default; (b) setting forth duties of the Authority in relation to the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation, and insurance of any project or other property of the Authority and the amount of fees, rents, and other charges to be charged; (c) providing for the collection of such fees, rents, and other charges and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys of the Authority; (d) providing for the creation of sinking funds and the creation and maintenance of reserves; and (e) setting forth conditions or limitations with respect to incurring indebtedness or granting mortgages or other liens. Such trust indenture, trust, or other agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders, trustee, or other agent for bondholders and restrict the individual right of action by bondholders.

The Authority may grant mortgages, deeds of trust, security interests, and other liens on its real and personal property, including its accounts receivable, to secure bonds. All pledges of revenues of the Authority for payment of bonds are valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The revenues pledged and received by the Authority are subject immediately to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery of such pledge or further act. The lien of any such pledge is valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the Authority whether or not such parties have notice of the lien. The Authority may provide for the recording or filing of any mortgage, deed of trust, security interest, other lien, financing statement, or other instrument necessary or desirable to create, perfect, or evidence any lien created pursuant to this chapter.

It is lawful for any bank or trust company within or outside the Commonwealth to (i) serve as depository of the proceeds of bonds or other revenues of the Authority, (ii) furnish indemnifying bonds, or (iii) pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust indenture, agreement, resolution, or other agreements relating to any project, including those to which the Authority may not be a party, may be treated as a part of the costs of a project.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:28; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2422.
Remedies of obligees of Authority.

Except to the extent that the rights granted by this chapter may be restricted by such trust indenture or trust or other agreement, any (i) holder of bonds or coupons issued under the provisions of this chapter and (ii) trustee or other agent for bondholders under any trust indenture or trust or other agreement may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, injunction, mandamus, or other proceedings, (a) protect and enforce any and all rights granted by this chapter or under the laws of the Commonwealth, such trust indenture, trust, or other agreement, or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds and (b) enforce and compel the Authority or any agent or officer of the Authority to perform all duties required by this chapter or such trust indenture, trust, or other agreement or resolution, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of fees, rents, and other charges.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:29; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2423.
Bonds to be legal investments.

Bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter are securities (i) in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them and (ii) that may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state officer or officer of a locality or agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations is authorized by law.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:30; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2424.
Existing bonds.

The Authority may assume or agree to make payments in amounts sufficient for the University to pay some or all of the hospital obligations incurred under resolutions previously adopted by the University with respect to the hospital facilities and may issue bonds to refund bonds issued under such resolutions or refinance such payment obligations. If the Authority assumes all hospital obligations under any such bond resolution and operates substantially all of the hospital facilities financed or refinanced by such bond resolution, the University, State Treasurer, Virginia Public Building Authority, and Virginia College Building Authority shall take such steps as are appropriate to provide for the substitution of the Authority for the University under such resolution and transfer to the Authority any funds payable to the University under the terms of such resolution.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:31; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2425.
Confidential and public information.

The Authority is subject to the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), including the exclusions set forth in subdivision 14 of §

2.2-3705.7

and subdivision A 23 of §

2.2-3711

.

For purposes of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), meetings of the board are not considered meetings of the board of visitors of the University. Meetings of the board may be conducted through electronic communication means as provided in §

2.2-3708.3

.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:32; 1998, c. 449; 1999, cc. 703, 726; 2004, c. 690; 2007, c. 945; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 778; 2018, c. 55; 2022, c. 597.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 14 of §

2.2-3705.7

” for “subdivision 15 of §

2.2-3705.7

” in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 55 substituted “electronic communication means as provided in §

2.2-3708

.2” for “telephonic or video means as provided in §

2.2-3708

” in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 597, inserted “Virginia” in subsections A and B; and substituted “§

2.2-3708.3

” for “§

2.2-3708.2

” in subsection B.

§ 23.1-2426.
Chapter liberally construed.

This chapter shall constitute full and complete authority, without regard to the provisions of any other law, for the performance of acts authorized in the chapter and shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of the chapter. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other general, specific, or local law, the provisions of this chapter control.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:33; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2427.
Exemptions.

The provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.), the Workforce Transition Act (§

2.2-3200

et seq.), the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), and the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) do not apply to the Authority in its exercise of any power conferred to it under this chapter.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:34; 2016, c. 588.